California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
-------------------------------------------

11101.5.

The legislative body shall also have the power to acquire, by gift, purchase, eminent domain or otherwise, land, real property, or rights-of-way which will become part of a city street established as a pedestrian mall or which will otherwise be used by the city as part of, or for purposes connected with, a pedestrian mall, and such land, real property, or rights-of-way may be improved in the same manner as city streets may be improved under subdivision (d) of Section 11101. The legislative body shall also have the power to make such improvements on city streets adjacent to the pedestrian mall where such improvements are necessary or convenient to the operation of the mall. The acquisitions and improvements authorized by this section shall be deemed “improvements” as such term or a related term is used in this part and particularly in Sections 11101 and 11203 and in Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 11700) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

The powers herein granted to prohibit, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on any city street shall be in addition to and not limited by the powers granted by Section 21101 of the Vehicle Code or by any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.

This part and all of its provisions shall be liberally construed to the end that its purpose may be effective. Any proceedings taken pursuant to this part shall not be held invalid for failure to comply with the provisions of this part, if the acts done and proceedings taken are not invalid under the State or Federal Constitutions.

This part does not affect any other law relating to the same or similar subject, but provides an alternative procedure for the subject to which it relates. When proceedings are taken under this part, its provisions only shall apply. The Special Assessment Investigation, Limitation and Majority Protest Act of 1931 shall not apply to any proceedings taken under this part nor to any proceedings taken under any other law for the improvement of a pedestrian mall.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Resolution of Intention [11200. - 11204.]

11200.

When the legislative body shall determine that the public interest and convenience require the establishment of a pedestrian mall and that vehicular traffic will not be unduly inconvenienced thereby, it may adopt a resolution declaring its intention to establish such pedestrian mall. Such resolution shall contain:

(a) The determination and declaration referred to above.

(b) A general description of the city streets, or portions thereof, which are proposed to be established as a pedestrian mall.

(c) A general description of the mall intersections.

(d) A general description of the intersecting streets.

(e) A statement that the legislative body proposes to adopt an ordinance prohibiting, in whole or in part, vehicular traffic on such pedestrian mall. If vehicular traffic is proposed to be prohibited only in part, the resolution shall also contain a general statement of the exceptions proposed to be made. Such exceptions may include exceptions in favor of public, emergency, utility and other classes of vehicles, may include exceptions in favor of all or certain classes of vehicles during certain days or during portions of days, and may include other exceptions of any kind or nature.

(f) A general statement of the source or sources of moneys proposed to be used to pay damages, if any, allowed or awarded to any property owner by reason of the establishment of the pedestrian mall.

(g) A day, hour and place for the hearing by the legislative body of protests and objections to the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall, and a statement that any and all persons having any objection to the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall may file a written protest with the clerk of the legislative body at any time not later than the hour so fixed for the hearing.

(h) A statement that any person owning or having any legal or equitable interest in any real property which might suffer legal damage by reason of the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall may file a written claim of damages with the clerk of the legislative body at any time not later than the hour so fixed for hearing; that such written claim must describe the real property as to which the claim is made, must state the exact nature of the claimant’s interest therein, must state the nature of the claimed damage thereto, and must state the amount of damages claimed; that failure to file such written claim within the time provided shall be deemed a waiver of any claim for damages or compensation and shall operate as a bar to any subsequent action seeking to prevent the establishment of said pedestrian mall or to recover damages on account of such establishment; and that the filing of such a claim shall operate as a bar in any subsequent action to the recovery of any damages or compensation in excess of the amount stated in such claim.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11201.

In such resolution any street may be described by referring thereto by its lawful or official name, or the name by which it is commonly known, and the pedestrian mall, the mall intersections, and the intersecting streets may be described by reference to a map or plat thereof on file in the office of the clerk of the legislative body.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11202.

In such resolution the legislative body may propose to pay the whole or any part of damages, if any, allowed or awarded to any property owner by reason of the establishment of the pedestrian mall from the proceeds of assessments levied upon lands benefited by the establishment of the pedestrian mall. In such case the resolution shall also contain:

(a) A general description of the district (which may consist of noncontiguous portions) within which lie the lands deemed by the legislative body to be benefited by the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall. Such district may be described as provided in Section 5181.

(b) A statement that an assessment will be levied pursuant to this part to pay the whole or a stated portion of the damages, if any, allowed or awarded to any property owner by reason of the establishment of such pedestrian mall and the costs and expenses in connection with proceedings or actions taken pursuant to this part.

(c) If bonds are to be issued, a statement that bonds to represent unpaid assessments will be issued, and the interest rate, or maximum interest rate, and term, or maximum term, of any such bonds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11203.

If in connection with the initial establishment of a pedestrian mall, the legislative body proposes to make any improvements of the kind or type referred to in subdivision (d) of Section 11101, such resolution shall also contain:

(a) A general description of the improvements proposed to be made. Such description may be made (but is not required to be made) in any manner permitted or provided in any law under which such improvements are to be made or financed.

(b) A general statement of the source or sources of moneys proposed to be used to pay the costs and expenses of such improvements.

(c) If all or any part of such improvements are proposed to be made or financed under the Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, or similar special assessment law, a statement as to what law is proposed to be so used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11204.

(a) In connection with the initial establishment or the extension of a pedestrian mall, expenditures for the acquisition, construction or reconstruction (but not including expenditures for normal maintenance or repair) of streets within the proposed pedestrian mall made subsequent to such resolution or within three years prior to the adoption of such resolution from the proceeds of any tax, license, or fee imposed upon the ownership or operation of vehicles or the fuel used therein, shall be included as a cost of improvement of the mall. If the mall is subsequently established, an amount equivalent thereto shall be paid from moneys used to finance improvement of the mall into the special gas tax street improvement fund or the traffic safety fund in the case of a city, or into the special road improvement fund in the case of a county.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall not apply to any expenditure made from proceeds of the vehicle license fee imposed under Division 2, Part 5 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, nor to any expenditure made prior to June 30, 1961.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Notice and Hearing [11301. - 11311.]

11301.

Copies of the resolution headed “Notice of Intention to Establish a Pedestrian Mall” in letters at least one-half inch in height shall be posted not more than 300 feet apart as follows:

(a) On all city streets, or portions thereof, proposed to be established as a pedestrian mall.

(b) On all intersecting streets.

(c) If assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 11202, then upon all open streets within the district described in the resolution pursuant to such section.

Such copies shall be posted not less than 90 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.

A copy of the resolution shall be mailed, not less than 45 days prior to the hearing to each person to whom any of the following described lands is assessed as shown on the last equalized assessment roll, at his or her address as shown upon that roll, and to any person, whether owner in fee or having a lien upon, or legal or equitable interest in, any of those lands whose name and address and a designation of the land in which he or she is interested is on file in the office of the city clerk or clerk of the board of supervisors, as the case may be. Those lands are as follows:

(a) All parcels of land abutting upon any portion of the pedestrian mall or any portion of any intersecting street.

(b) If assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 11202, then the notice procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

The legislative body may determine that the resolution shall also be mailed to other persons as it may specify.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 130.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.5.

A copy of the resolution of intention shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which lies any portion of any parcel of land abutting upon any portion of the proposed pedestrian mall or upon any portion of any intersecting street. The copy shall be recorded not less than 90 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

11303.

Not later than the hour set for hearing any interested person may, severally or with others, file with the clerk of the legislative body written objection to the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall. Any protest or objection may be withdrawn at any time by written notice of the withdrawal filed with the clerk of the legislative body with the same effect as if it had never been made. If assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 11202, the protest and hearing procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11304.

Not later than the hour set for hearing any person owning, or having any legal or equitable interest in, any real property which might suffer legal damage by reason of the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall may file with the clerk of the legislative body a written claim of damages. Such written claim must describe the real property as to which the claim is made, must state the exact nature of the claimant’s interest therein, must state the nature of the claimed damage thereto, and must state the amount of damages claimed. The failure to file such written claim within the time provided shall be deemed a waiver of any claim for damages or compensation and shall operate as a bar to subsequent action seeking to prevent the establishment of said pedestrian mall or to recover damages on account of such establishment. The filing of such claim shall operate as a bar in any subsequent action to the recovery of any damages or compensation in excess of the amount stated in such claim. Any such claim may be withdrawn by the claimant at any time by written withdrawal with the same effect as if it had never been filed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11305.

At the hearing held pursuant to Section 54954.6 of the Government Code to establish the proposed district all objections and protests shall be heard and considered, and all claims shall be heard and considered. The hearing may be continued from time to time by order entered on the minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1234, Sec. 23.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

11306.

If the owners of lands abutting on the proposed pedestrian mall representing a majority of the frontage on the proposed pedestrian mall have made written objection to the establishment of the proposed pedestrian mall, the legislative body shall so find and shall terminate the proceedings for such establishment. In such event no proceeding hereunder for the establishment of the same or substantially the same pedestrian mall shall be commenced within one year after such termination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11307.

If assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 11202, then the notice, protest, and hearing procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11308.

If assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 11202, then at the hearing the legislative body may change the boundaries of the proposed district by adding thereto land which in its opinion will be benefited by the establishment of the pedestrian mall or by excluding from the district lands which in its opinion will not be so benefited. If the legislative body proposes any such change, the notice, protest, and hearing procedures shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11309.

Any objections or protests, whether to the things proposed by the resolution of intention or to any changes proposed pursuant to Section 11308, not made at the time and in the manner provided by this part are deemed voluntarily waived, and the proceedings hereunder shall not be attacked on any ground not stated in a written objection filed as provided in this part. Except in the case of a majority protest, as provided in Section 11306, or Section 11307, the legislative body may sustain or deny any or all objections or protests and its determination is final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11310.

At the hearing on the resolution of intention the legislative body may allow any claim for damages made pursuant to Section 11304. Any such allowance shall be for the full amount of damages claimed in the written claim except that the legislative body, with the written consent of the claimant, may allow a claim for a lesser amount. The right of any claimant to payment of the amount of any allowed claim shall be contingent upon the final establishment of the pedestrian mall; but all allowed claims must be paid by the city, from such source as the legislative body may determine, before vehicular traffic is prohibited, in whole or in part, on the pedestrian mall, pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11311.

Following the conclusion of the hearing, the legislative body shall by resolution either abandon the proceeding taken pursuant to this part or determine that the pedestrian mall shall be established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Determination of Disputed Claims [11400. - 11402.]

11400.

If following the hearing the legislative body shall determine that the pedestrian mall shall be established, and if at that time there remain any written claims for damages which have not been allowed pursuant to Section 11310 or which have not been withdrawn, the legislative body shall direct that an action or actions be brought in the superior court in the name of the city by the county counsel, district attorney, or city attorney, as the case may be, or other attorney designated by the legislative body for a determination of the damages, if any, to which the claimant may legally be entitled because of the establishment of the pedestrian mall. Such action shall be in the nature of a proceeding in eminent domain for the condemnation of the right or rights in real property, the taking of which by the establishment of the pedestrian mall results in the damages claimed. Except as may otherwise be provided in this part, such action and proceeding shall be governed so far as the same may be made applicable by the provisions relating to proceedings in eminent domain. Except as provided in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1245.210) of Chapter 4 of Title 7 of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure, in any such action the resolution of intention adopted pursuant to this part and the resolution adopted under Section 11311 conclusively establish the matters referred to in Section 1240.030 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

11401.

The judgment in any such action shall be satisfied and a final order taken before vehicular traffic is prohibited, in whole or in part, on the pedestrian mall pursuant to this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11402.

Anything in this part to the contrary notwithstanding, nothing in this part shall be construed or interpreted as creating any right in any person to damages or compensation by reason of the establishment of a pedestrian mall, it being the intention of the Legislature in enacting this part to provide an orderly method for the determination and payment only of such damages and compensation as are required by the Constitutions of the State of California and the United States of America. In this connection the Legislature hereby expressly declares that it is its intention that to the extent to which the establishment of a pedestrian mall is justifiable as an exercise of the police power for which no compensation is constitutionally required, no damages or compensation shall be allowed in any action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Assessments and Bonds [11500. - 11505.]

11500.

If assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 11202, then in the resolution provided for in Section 11311, the legislative body shall fix and establish the boundaries of the district as finally determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11501.

After all claims for damages filed pursuant to this part have been finally determined, by allowance by the legislative body, by withdrawal, or by a judgment in an action or actions brought pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11400), and the full amount of damages to be paid has accordingly been finally determined, all or any part of the total amount of damages (but not exceeding that part thereof as may be specified in the resolution of intention), together with all costs and expenses incurred in connection with any proceedings or actions taken pursuant to this part, may be assessed against the lands within the district and subject to assessment, in proportion to the special benefits, in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIID of the California Constitution, to be derived from the establishment of the pedestrian mall.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11502.

An assessment may be levied and bonds to represent unpaid assessments issued and sold substantially in the manner provided in the Vehicle Parking District Law of 1943, and to the extent applicable, that law shall govern as to the preparation of the diagram, the lien of the assessments, the notice of recordation, the collection of assessments, the issuance, sale and delivery of bonds upon unpaid assessments, the term of the bonds, the maximum interest rate thereon, the collection and enforcement of those bonds, and all other matters to the extent applicable and except as provided in this part. The notice, protest, and hearing procedures regarding the levying of the assessment shall comply with Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 39.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11503.

In so applying the provisions of the Vehicle Parking District Law of 1943, the following provisions and exceptions shall apply:

(a) The limits provided by said law on the amount of the assessment shall not apply.

(b) The legislative body shall provide for the form of the bonds and of the principal and interest coupons to be attached thereto.

(c) The legislative body may provide that the redemption provisions of said bonds shall require the payment of such premium as the legislative body may specify.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11504.

All collections of assessments and all proceeds of the sale of bonds issued upon unpaid assessments shall be placed in a special fund and used exclusively for the payment of the damages, if any, and expenses for which the assessments were levied. If there is a surplus in such special fund, the legislative body may expend such surplus for the improvement or operation of the pedestrian mall.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11505.

Notwithstanding the fact that the proceedings under this part have provided that assessments are to be levied as contemplated by Section 11202, the legislative body, at any time and either before or after the adoption of the resolution provided for in Section 11311, may determine that such assessments shall not be levied. In lieu thereof the legislative body may provide for the payment of all or any part of the amounts referred to in Section 11501 out of general funds of the city or out of any other available funds. No money available for expenditure within the city from the proceeds of any tax, license or fee imposed by any public agency upon the ownership or operation of vehicles or the fuel used therein shall be used to pay such amounts, except as may be permitted by Section 11005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. The legislative body may also provide at any time for the payment of all or any part of such amounts by including the same as part of the incidental expenses in any proceeding taken for the improvement of the pedestrian mall under the Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, or similar special assessment law for the improvement of the pedestrian mall.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Establishment of the Mall [11600. - 11603.]

11600.

Following the adoption of the resolution provided for in Section 11311, and as soon as moneys have been fully provided for the payment of all claims, if any, allowed pursuant to Section 11310 and for the payment of all damages and compensation, if any, awarded in any action or actions brought pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing at Section 11400) hereof, the legislative body may adopt an ordinance establishing the pedestrian mall. Such ordinance shall contain:

(a) A general description of the pedestrian mall and a declaration and determination that the same is finally established. The mall as finally established shall be substantially the same as that described in the resolution of intention. 

(b) Rules and regulations prohibiting vehicular traffic on such pedestrian mall subject to such exceptions as the ordinance may provide. Such rules and regulations and such exceptions shall be substantially in accordance with the statements made in the resolution of intention.

(c) Such additional rules and regulations as the legislative body may determine pertaining to the interpretation, operation and enforcement of the rules and regulations referred to in subdivision (b) above, and otherwise pertaining to the use, operation, maintenance and control of the pedestrian mall.

(d) Such provisions as the legislative body may determine pertaining to the operative date or dates of any of such rules or regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11601.

Such ordinance shall be adopted and published in the manner, and shall take effect, as provided by law or charter for other ordinances of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11602.

Such ordinance shall be subject to referendum in the same manner as other ordinances of the city. No payment of allowed claims or damages or compensation awarded by any court shall be made until such ordinance is in effect but all such allowed claims, damages and compensation shall be paid before the rules and regulations provided in such ordinance become operative.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11603.

Proceedings under this part and the adoption of such ordinance notwithstanding, the city and its legislative body shall retain its police powers and other rights and powers relating to the city streets constituting a part of the pedestrian mall. No action taken pursuant to this part shall be interpreted or construed to be a vacation or abandonment, in whole or in part, of any city street or any right therein, it being intended that the establishment of a pedestrian mall pursuant to this part be a matter of regulation only. Nothing in this part shall be interpreted or construed to prevent the city and its legislative body at any time subsequent to the adoption of the ordinance provided for in this chapter, from abandoning the operation of the pedestrian mall, from changing the extent of the pedestrian mall, or from changing or repealing any of the rules and regulations pertaining to the pedestrian mall but Section 11304 shall not operate as a bar to any claim of damages resulting solely from changes made subsequent to the adoption of the ordinance provided for in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Improvement of the Pedestrian Mall [11700. - 11702.]

11700.

The city and its legislative body shall have the power to improve a pedestrian mall as provided in subdivision (d) of Section 11101, and for the accomplishment, in whole or in part, of that purpose may use the Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, or any similar special assessment law. Any work or improvement permitted by said subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be work or improvement permitted to be done under any such act or law. The city may also pay the whole or any part of the cost and expenses of improving a pedestrian mall from its general funds or from any other available money and may let contracts for the work in any manner permitted by law or charter. No money available for expenditure within the city from the proceeds of any tax, license, or fee imposed by any public agency upon the ownership or operation of vehicles or the fuel used therein shall be used to pay such cost or expense, except as may be permitted by Section 11005 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11701.

A pedestrian mall established or to be established pursuant to this part may be so improved either concurrently with the proceedings taken under this part for the establishment of the pedestrian mall or at any time subsequent to the establishment of the city mall, but no contract for the work or improvement shall be awarded until moneys have been fully provided for the payment of all claims allowed pursuant to Section 11310 and for the payment of all damages and compensation, if any, awarded in any action or actions brought pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing at Section 11400) hereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

11702.

If in connection with the establishment of a pedestrian mall and concurrently with the proceedings taken pursuant to this part, the legislative body proposes to improve the proposed pedestrian mall and for that purpose uses the Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, or any similar special assessment law, the legislative body may combine any part of the proceedings taken pursuant to this part with any part of the proceedings taken under any such special assessment law, to the end that duplication of ordinances, resolutions, notices, hearings and other acts or proceedings may be avoided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1960, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 33.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Special Ad Valorem Assessments [11800. - 11806.]

11800.

As used in this chapter, the term “district” means the district within which lie the lands deemed by the legislative body to be benefited by the establishment of the pedestrian mall, the boundaries of which have been finally fixed and established pursuant to Section 11500, and in this event such district so established shall be the “district” within the meaning of this chapter even though the legislative body may have determined pursuant to Section 11505 that assessments shall not be levied as contemplated by Section 11202.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11801.

If a district contemplated by Section 11800 has not been established pursuant to Section 11500, then the term “district” as used in this chapter means the district deemed by the legislative body to be benefited by the establishment of the pedestrian mall, the boundaries of which district have been finally fixed and established in the first proceeding taken for the improvement of the pedestrian mall pursuant to the Improvement Act of 1911, the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 or any similar special assessment law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11802.

If a district has not been established as contemplated by either Section 11800 or Section 11801, this chapter shall not be applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11803.

Following the establishment of a pedestrian mall pursuant to this part and annually on or before June 30th, the legislative body may prepare and approve an estimate of the expenditures required during the ensuing fiscal year for the maintenance, operation, repair and improvement of the pedestrian mall and shall deduct from such estimate the amount of revenues, if any, which the legislative body estimates will accrue to the city during such year from the operation of the pedestrian mall.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11804.

The legislative body may levy and collect in any year upon and against all of the taxable land and improvements within the district a special ad valorem assessment sufficient to raise a sum of money not exceeding the net amount determined pursuant to Section 11803 but the rate of assessment in any one year shall not exceed fifty cents ($0.50) on each one hundred dollars ($100) assessed value as shown on the assessment roll used by the city for city taxation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 765.)
-------------------------------------------

11804.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 11804, the maximum rate which may be assessed by the legislative body of the City of Redding for the Redding Midtown Project No. 1, R-120 only, is two dollars ($2) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value.

Assessments for such project shall only be levied on property located within the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 178.)
-------------------------------------------

11805.

The special ad valorem assessment shall be levied, collected, and enforced at the same times, in the same manner, by the same officers, and with the same interest and penalties, as in the case of general taxes levied by the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------

11806.

The proceeds of the assessment shall be placed in a separate fund of the city and shall be expended only for the maintenance, operation, repair or improvement of the pedestrian mall.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 459.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 14. STREET LIGHTING [18000. - 19402.]



PART 1. THE STREET LIGHTING ACT OF 1919 [18000. - 18193.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [18000. - 18014.]

18000.

This part may be cited as the Street Lighting Act of 1919.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18001.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions obtained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18002.

This part shall be liberally construed in order to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18003.

This part provides an alternative system for making the improvements authorized by this part and the provisions of this part shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this code.

When any proceedings are commenced under this part, the provisions of this part and no others shall apply to such proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18004.

“Street lighting system” and “system” include any or all appliances, poles, posts, electroliers, transformers, lighting units, lamps, cables, wires, pipes, conduits and other suitable or necessary works or appliances for street lighting purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18004.5.

“Street,” and any of its variants, mean and include highways, state highways, roads, avenues, boulevards, alleys, parkways and other public places and ways dedicated to public use, or any portion thereof, within a city or along a boundary of a city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 855.)
-------------------------------------------

18005.

“Tax collector” and “city tax collector” mean the city officer, board or employee designated as such by the city council in the resolution levying the assessment, and the officer, board or employee so designated shall discharge all duties prescribed as those of tax collector or city tax collector and all provisions applicable to the tax collector or city tax collector shall apply to the officer, board or employee so designated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18006.

“Service,” and any of its variants, means and includes the furnishing of electric current or energy, gas, or other illuminating agent to all or part of any street lighting system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18007.

“Improvement,” and any of its variants, include the maintenance or servicing, or both, of all or part of any one or more street lighting systems and, where applicable, the installation of street lighting systems owned by any public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 852.)
-------------------------------------------

18007.5.

“Maintenance,” and any of its variants, as used in this part includes the replacement of any obsolete equipment with the new modern equipment necessary for an adequate street lighting system or systems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 620.)
-------------------------------------------

18008.

“Assessment district” means the territory to be benefited by the proposed improvement and to be assessed to pay the costs and expenses thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18009.

“Clerk” and “city clerk” mean any person or officer who is or acts as clerk of the city council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18010.

“Treasurer” and “city treasurer” include any person or officer who has charge of and makes payment of city funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18011.

“City” includes all corporations organized and existing for municipal purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18012.

“City Council” and “council” include any body which by law is the legislative department of the government of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

18014.

If lots or parcels of land belonging to the United States, to this state, or to a county, city, public agency, mandatory of the government, school board, educational, penal or reform institution, or facility for housing of persons with developmental or intellectual disabilities or mental health disorders are in use in the performance of a public function and are included within the assessment district, the city council may, in the resolution of intention, declare that the lots or parcels of land, or any of them, shall be omitted from the assessment thereafter to be made to cover the costs and expenses of the improvement. If the lots or parcels of land, or any of them, are omitted from the assessment by the resolution, the total cost and expense of all work done shall be assessed on the remaining lots lying